apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
    <pardef n="sám__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sám</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sám</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sama</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samo</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samého</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samého</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samej</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samého</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samému</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samému</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samej</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samému</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>samého</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sám</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samu</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samo</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samým</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samým</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samou</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samým</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samom</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samom</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samej</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samom</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sám</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sám</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sama</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samo</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Plurals -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sami</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samy</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samy</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samy</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samých</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samých</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samých</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samých</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samým</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samým</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samým</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samým</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samých</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samy</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samy</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samy</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samými</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samými</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samými</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samými</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samých</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samých</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samých</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samých</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sami</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>samy</l>
          <r>sám<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>

    <e lm="sám"><i></i><par n="sám__prn"/></e>
